Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6628XS (6) 91 da/js S.F. 2269 Section 1. IOWA NUTRIENT RESEARCH CENTER ââ WATER 1 QUALITY. There is appropriated from the water quality 2 infrastructure fund created in section 8.57B to Iowa state 3 university of science and technology for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 5 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 6 purposes designated: 7 To support the Iowa nutrient research center established 8 in section 466B.47 in administering the Iowa water quality 9 information systems, including through the use of sensors to 10 provide data regarding the impact of nutrient loads to this 11 stateâs surface waters: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 13